tests/morphophonology/ui.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../../kaz.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../../kaz.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "Kazakh words with morphological и and у and front vowels":
    ері<v><iv><ger><acc> : еруді
    ері<v><iv><ger><gen> : ерудің
    ері<v><iv><ger><dat> : еруге
    ері<v><iv><ger><pl><acc> : ерулерді
    ері<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : ериді

  "Kazakh words with morphological и and у and back vowels":
    оқы<v><iv><ger><acc> : оқуды
    оқы<v><iv><ger><gen> : оқудың
    оқы<v><iv><ger><abl> : оқудан
    оқы<v><iv><ger><dat> : оқуға
    оқы<v><iv><ger><pl><acc> : оқуларды
    оқы<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : оқиды
    атқар<v><tv><gpr_pot> : атқарушы

  "Kazakh nouns with lexical и and у and front vowels":
    ит<n><gen> : иттің
    ит<n><pl><gen> : иттердің
    у<n><gen> : удың
    у<n><dat> : уға
    у<n><pl><gen> : улардың
    су<n><gen> : судың
    су<n><dat> : суға
    су<n><pl><gen> : сулардың
    тау<n><gen> : таудың
    тау<n><pl><gen> : таулардың
    тарих<n><px3sp><nom> : тарихы
    тарих<n><px3sp><abl> : тарихынан
    тарих<n><abl> : тарихтан

  "Kazakh verbs with lexical и and у and front vowels":
    си<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : сиеді
    си<v><iv><ger><nom> : сию
    си<v><iv><ger><dat> : сиюге
    си<v><iv><ger><abl> : сиюден
    си<v><iv><ger><gen> : сиюдің
    си<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : сиеді
    ки<v><tv><ger><nom> : кию
    ки<v><tv><ger><dat> : киюге
    ки<v><tv><ger><abl> : киюден
    ки<v><tv><ger><gen> : киюдің

  "Kazakh verbs with lexical и and у and back vowels":
    жи<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : жияды
    жи<v><tv><pass><prc_perf> : жиылып
    жи<v><tv><ger><nom> : жию
    жи<v><tv><ger><dat> : жиюға
    жи<v><tv><ger><abl> : жиюдан
    жи<v><tv><ger><gen> : жиюдың
    қи<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : қияды
    қи<v><tv><ger><nom> : қию
    қи<v><tv><ger><dat> : қиюға
    қи<v><tv><ger><abl> : қиюдан
    қи<v><tv><ger><gen> : қиюдың
    жу<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : жуады
    жу<v><tv><ger><nom> : жуу
    жу<v><tv><ger><dat> : жууға
    жу<v><tv><ger><abl> : жуудан
    жу<v><tv><ger><gen> : жуудың

  "Kazakh verbs ending in й":
    қой<v><tv><ger><nom> : қою
    қой<v><tv><ger><dat> : қоюға
    қой<v><tv><ger><abl> : қоюдан
    қой<v><tv><ger><gen> : қоюдың

  "Russian words with и":
    журналист<n><gen> : журналистің
    журналист<n><abl> : журналистен
    журналист<n><dat> : журналистке
    журналист<n><px3sp><nom> : журналисті
    организм<n><gen> : организмнің
    организм<n><abl> : организмнен
    организм<n><dat> : организмге
    организм<n><px3sp><nom> : организмі
    саммит<n><px3sp><nom> : саммиті
    саммит<n><abl> : саммиттен
    саммит<n><dat> : саммитке

  "Russian words with у":
    минут<n><gen> : минуттың
    минут<n><abl> : минуттан
    минут<n><dat> : минутқа
    минут<n><px3sp><nom> : минуты
    клуб<n><gen> : клубтың
    клуб<n><abl> : клубтан
    клуб<n><dat> : клубқа
    клуб<n><px3sp><nom> : клубы

  "Russian words with у and и":
    институт<n><gen> : институттың
    институт<n><abl> : институттан
    институт<n><dat> : институтқа
    институт<n><px3sp><nom> : институты
    буддизм<n><gen> : буддизмнің
    буддизм<n><abl> : буддизмнен
    буддизм<n><dat> : буддизмге
    буддизм<n><px3sp><nom> : буддизмі

  "Related Russian words":
    финал<n><gen> : финалдің
    финал<n><abl> : финалден
    финал<n><dat> : финалге
    финал<n><px3sp><nom> : финалі
